Utah statutes.
53-6-103.   Peace Officer Standards and Training Division -- Creation --
Administration -- Duties.
(1)  There is created within the department the Peace Officer Standards and
Training Division.
(2)  The division shall be administered by a director acting under the
supervision and control of the commissioner.
(3)  The division shall promote and ensure the safety and welfare of the
citizens of this state in their respective communities and provide for
efficient and professional law enforcement by establishing minimum standards
and training for peace officers and dispatchers throughout the state.
